Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,225
Forcible entry and detainer; continuance for more than seven days; undertaking required.

No continuance shall be granted for a longer period than seven days, unless upon cause shown to the court of the existence of extraordinary causes and then not unless the defendant applying therefor shall give an undertaking to the adverse party, with good and sufficient surety to be approved by the court, conditioned for the payment of any rents that have or may accrue, and any additional damages that may be sustained by such adverse party by reason of the continuance, if judgment be rendered against the defendant.

Laws 1929, c. 82, § 124, p. 311;

C.S.1929, § 22-1208;

R.S.1943, § 26-1,125;

Laws 1972, LB 1032, § 75;

R.S.1943, (1985), § 24-575.

A court should not grant an indefinite continuance in a forcible entry and detainer action, because doing so defeats the speedy nature of the remedy. Federal Nat. Mortgage Assn. v. Marcuzzo, 289 Neb. 301, 854 N.W.2d 774 (2014).